Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.255

Capital grants.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) The department shall coordinate with cities, counties, hospitals, and other public and private entities to identify locations that may be commissioned or renovated for use in treating clients committed to the department for competency evaluation, competency restoration, civil conversion, or treatment following acquittal by reason of insanity.

(2) The department may provide capital grants to entities to accomplish the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section subject to provision of funding provided for this specific purpose.

[ 2023 c 453 s 19.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 453: See note following RCW 10.77.060.